Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1685XS (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. 279 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 657.13 Sport and exposition venues 1 ââ immunity. 2 1. As used in this section, âsports or exposition venueâ 3 means a venue where competitive sporting events occur 4 involving motorized vehicles, whether for racing or nonracing 5 competition, or competitive athletic events, and also includes 6 large public exhibitions of art or trade goods, trade fairs, 7 display shows, presentation, and demonstration exhibits, 8 and includes the venueâs owners, agents, employees, and 9 contractors. 10 2. A person shall not file a nuisance action to recover 11 damages in which an event at a sports or exposition venue is 12 alleged to be a public or private nuisance unless all of the 13 following are true: 14 a. The person is the majority owner of the real property 15 allegedly adversely affected by a competitive sporting or 16 exposition event. 17 b. The sporting or exposition event has materially violated 18 a federal, state, or local law. 19 3. A sports or exposition venue within the state which has 20 been in operation for a period of more than one year shall not 21 be considered a public or private nuisance as the result of a 22 changed condition in or about the locality where the sports 23 or exposition venue is located. In any public or private 24 nuisance action against a sports or exposition venue, proof 25 that the sports or exposition venue has operated for one or 26 more years is an absolute defense to the action, provided that 27 the operation is in compliance with all applicable federal, 28 state, and local laws, regulations, and permits. 29 4. A state or local agency shall not bring a criminal 30 or civil action against a sports or exposition venue for an 31 activity that is in material compliance with all applicable 32 state and local laws, regulations, and permits. 33 5. A sports or exposition venue shall not be or become a 34 private or public nuisance if the operators are conducting the 35 -1- LSB 1685XS (2) 91 cm/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 279 sports or exposition venue operation in a manner consistent 1 with commonly accepted practice. If the sports or exposition 2 venue operation is in material compliance with all applicable 3 federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and permits, the 4 sports or exposition venue operation shall be presumed to 5 be conducted in a manner consistent with commonly accepted 6 practices of sports or exposition venue operations. 7 6. a. A sports or exposition venue shall not be considered 8 a public or private nuisance if the sports or exposition venue 9 makes a reasonable expansion, provided that the sports or 10 exposition venue operation is in material compliance with all 11 applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and permits. 12 b. For the purpose of this subsection, a reasonable 13 expansion includes all of the following: 14 (1) Transfer of the sports or exposition venue operation. 15 (2) Purchase of additional land for the sports or exposition 16 venue. 17 (3) Introducing technology to an existing sports or 18 exposition venue operation, including new activities, 19 practices, equipment, and procedures consistent with 20 technological development within the sports or exposition venue 21 industry. 22 (4) Any other change that is related and applied to an 23 existing sports or exposition venue, so long as the change does 24 not affect the sports or exposition venueâs compliance with 25 applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and permits. 26 c. The reasonable expansion exemption provided by this 27 subsection shall not apply to an expansion that: 28 (1) Creates a substantially adverse effect upon the 29 environment. 30 (2) Creates a hazard to public health and safety. 31 7. If a sports or exposition venue operation situated 32 outside of a municipalityâs corporate boundaries is 33 subsequently annexed or otherwise brought within the 34 municipalityâs corporate boundaries, the requirements of the 35 -2- LSB 1685XS (2) 91 cm/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 279 municipality do not apply to the sports or exposition venue 1 operation. 2 8. A sports or exposition venue operation shall not become 3 a private or public nuisance after the sports or exposition 4 venue has been in operation for more than one year, if the 5 sports or exposition venue was not a nuisance at the time 6 the operation began, and the conditions or circumstances 7 complained of as constituting the basis for the nuisance action 8 exist substantially unchanged since the established date of 9 operation. For purposes of this subsection, the established 10 date of operation is the date on which a sports or exposition 11 venue operation commenced. 12 9. This section shall not apply in any of the following 13 circumstances: 14 a. A nuisance action arises from the negligent operation of 15 any such sports or exposition venue. 16 b. A nuisance action for recovery which arises from an 17 injury or damages sustained by a person from a sports or 18 exposition venue operation or portion of a sports venue 19 operation that is conducted in violation of a federal, state, 20 or local statute, regulation, ordinance, or governmental 21 requirement that applies to the sports or exposition venue 22 operation. 23 10. The protected status of a sports or exposition venue 24 operation, once acquired, is assignable, alienable, and 25 inheritable. The protected status of a sports or exposition 26 venue operation, once acquired, shall not be waived by the 27 temporary cessation of operations or by diminishing the size 28 of the operation. 29